Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 183 Aviation

183.010.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

“Federal Aviation Administration” shall mean that agency or board of the United States government empowered to regulate operation of aircraft; aviation facilities and persons operating and maintaining aircraft;

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet;

“Cabinet” means the Transportation Cabinet, the statutory administrative department of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

165-48: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 10, § 1; 1944, ch. 24, § 1; 1944, ch. 147, § 1; 1945 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 1; 1946, ch. 48, § 1; 1958, ch. 153, § 1; 1960, ch. 179, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, §§ 20(4), 20(6); 1976, ch. 308, § 1.

183.011.
Definitions of aviation terms.

“Aeronautics” means the science and art of flight and includes but is not limited to transportation by aircraft; the operation, construction, repair, or maintenance of aircraft, aircraft power plants, and accessories, including the repair, packing, and maintenance of parachutes; the design, establishment, construction, extension, operation, improvement, repair, or maintenance of airports or other air navigation facilities; and instruction in flying or ground subjects pertaining thereto.

“Aircraft” means any contrivance now known, or hereafter invented, used or designed for navigation of or flight in the air.

“Air navigation” means the operation or navigation of aircraft in the air space over this state, or upon any airport within this state.

“Airport” means any area, of land or water, which is designed for the landing and take-off of aircraft, whether or not facilities are provided for the shelter, servicing, or repair of aircraft, or for receiving or discharging passengers or cargo, and all appurtenant areas used or suitable for airport building or other airport facilities, and all appurtenant rights-of-way, whether theretofore or hereinafter established.

“Airport board,” “airboard,” or “board” means a board established as provided in this chapter and any airport board or airboard created pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 183 as it existed prior to the enactment of 1960 Ky. Acts ch. 179 shall be deemed to have been established pursuant to this chapter with all of the powers, functions, and duties as herein prescribed.

“Airport facilities” includes land, buildings, equipment, runways, and other improvements and appurtenances necessary for the establishment and maintenance of airports.

“Airport hazard” means any structure, object, or natural growth, or use of land, which obstructs the air space required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at any airport or is otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking off.

“Certificate” means a certificate issued by the cabinet.

“Civil aircraft” means any aircraft other than a public aircraft.

“Charter operator” means all persons who transport or seek to transport persons or property in intrastate commerce for hire on unscheduled service and not between fixed points.

“Commercial airport” means an airport certified by the Federal Aviation Administration in accordance with 14 C.F.R. pt. 139.

“Common carrier” shall include all carriers for hire or compensation by air who operate, or seek to operate, over fixed routes or between fixed termini within the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

“Commuter air carrier” means a common carrier of persons or property in intrastate commerce for hire or compensation by air, operating under federal aviation regulation (FAR) Part 135 or other appropriate parts or regulations and who operates or seeks to operate on regular schedules with multi-engine aircraft between two (2) or more fixed airport termini or over fixed routes only within the Commonwealth of Kentucky and publishes flight schedules which specify the times, days of week, and places between which such flights are performed.

“Development” and “airport development” mean:

Any work involved in planning, designing, constructing, improving, or repairing a public airport or portion thereof, including the construction, alteration, and repair of airport buildings and the removal, lowering, relocation, and marking and lighting of airport hazards; and

Any acquisition of land, or any interest therein, or of any easement through or other interest in air space which is necessary to permit any required work or to remove, mitigate, prevent, or limit the establishment of airport hazards and expenses incident to the carrying out of the provisions of this chapter.

“General aviation airport” means any public-use airport that:

Does not have scheduled passenger service; or

Is not inspected and certified by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) for commercial or scheduled air service in accordance with 14 C.F.R. pt. 139.

“Navigable air space” means air space above the minimum altitudes of flight prescribed by the regulations of the Federal Aviation Administration or cabinet consistent therewith, and includes the air space necessary for normal landing or take off of aircraft.

“Operate,” as pertains to an unmanned aircraft, means the actions taken by an operator of an unmanned aircraft. “Operate” refers only to the actions of an operator on the ground and is not intended to regulate an unmanned aircraft flying in navigable airspace.

“Operation of aircraft” or “operate aircraft” means the use, navigation, or piloting of aircraft in the air space over this state, or upon any airport within this state. Any person who causes or authorizes the operation of aircraft, whether with or without the right of legal control as owner, lessee, or otherwise of the aircraft, shall be deemed to be engaged in the operation of aircraft within the meaning of the statutes of this state.

“Operator” means a person operating or flying an unmanned aircraft.

“Overhead line” means any cable, pipeline, wire, or similar substance of any kind or description.

“Permit” means a permit issued by the cabinet.

“Public aircraft” means an aircraft used exclusively in the service of any government or of any political subdivision thereof, including the government of the state, territory, or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, but not including any government-owned aircraft engaged in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes.

“Public airport” means any airport which is used or to be used for public purposes under the control of a public agency, the landing area of which is publicly owned.

“Public use airport” means any airport in the state airport plan open for use by the general public, not including a private airport used primarily for the benefit of the owner.

“State airport plan” means the plan of the cabinet for the development of public and certain private airports for the benefit of the people of this state.

“State airway” means a route in the navigable air space over the lands or waters of this state, designated by the cabinet as a route suitable for air navigation.

“Structure” means any object constructed or installed by man, including but not limited to buildings, towers, smokestacks, and overhead transmission lines.

“Tree” includes objects of natural growth.

“Unmanned aircraft” means an aircraft operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft.

“Unmanned aircraft facility map” means a map that may be developed by a commercial airport to display the airport facility’s airspace overlaid with latitude and longitude rectangular gridlines, or any other commercially available system, that reflects the areas where it is unsafe to operate an unmanned aircraft without authorization by the commercial airport operator on property owned by a commercial airport and in specific areas consistent with obstructions to navigation under 14 C.F.R. pt. 77.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 153, § 2; 1960, ch. 179, § 3; 1964, ch. 134, § 2; 1974, ch. 115, § 1; 1976, ch. 308, § 2; 1996, ch. 174, § 10, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 67, effective July 15, 1996; 2017 ch. 153, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 121, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). This section was amended by 1996 Ky. Acts chs. 174 and 318. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists between Acts ch. 174 and a nonsubstantive, stylistic amendment in Acts ch. 318, Acts ch. 174 prevails under Acts ch. 318, sec. 358.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Elizabethtown Airport Board is a public agency subject to the Open Records provisions of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

OAG 89-53

.

183.012.
Definitions of local administrative units.

“City” means any incorporated city;

As used in this chapter, “governmental unit” means any city, or the combination of any two (2) or more thereof, or any county, urban-county government, or combination of two (2) or more such counties, city or cities, acting jointly with any county or counties or an airboard or board established as provided in this chapter;

As used in this chapter, “ordinance,” in the case of a county, means resolution of the county legislative body, and in the case of an airport board or airboard means a resolution or regulation of the board.

“State” or “this state” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or body politic; and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representative thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 153, § 3; 1960, ch. 179, § 4; 1964, ch. 134, § 3; 1974, ch. 115, § 2.

183.020.
Kentucky Aeronautics Commission; members; qualifications; terms. [Repealed.]

183.021.
Department of aeronautics created — Functions — Commissioner. [Repealed.]

183.022.
Advisory Board of Aeronautics. [Repealed.]

183.023.
Aeronautics Commission and Director abolished; transfer of functions, properties and funds. [Repealed.]

183.024.
Rules and regulations.

The Transportation Cabinet may prescribe such rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, and may do all things reasonable or necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and other statutes relating or incidental to the field of aeronautics.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 225, § 4; 1960, ch. 179, § 7, effective March 25, 1960; 1982, ch. 183, § 4, effective July 15, 1982.

183.030.
Compensation; officers; employes; rules and regulations; general powers. [Repealed.]

183.031.
Investigations, hearings, inquiries and decisions by commission; orders. [Repealed.]

183.032.
Adjudicatory powers and proceedings. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 48, § 9; 1958, ch. 153, § 5; 1960, ch. 179, § 8; repealed by 2022 ch. 218, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

183.033.
Traveling expenses of commission and employes; use of aircraft for travel. [Repealed.]

183.040.
Kentucky Aeronautics Director; appointment; duties; powers. [Repealed.]

183.050.
Federal licensing and registration requirement for pilots and aircraft. [Repealed]

History.

165-49: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 153, § 6; 1960, ch. 179, § 9; 1976, ch. 308, § 3; repealed by 2022 ch. 218, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

183.060.
Licensing of pilots; qualifications. [Repealed.]

183.061.
Prohibition against operation of or acting as crewmember of civil aircraft while using or under the influence of alcohol or other substance — Consent to tests — Penalty — Reports to Federal Aviation Administration.

As used in this section, “crewmember” means any person performing or assigned to perform any duty in a civil aircraft during the time which the aircraft is undergoing preflight inspection, boarding, or carrying passengers or crew, or any time the aircraft is under power or in flight.

It is unlawful for any person to operate, attempt to operate, or act, or attempt to act, as a crewmember of any civil aircraft in this Commonwealth:

Within eight (8) hours after the consumption of any alcoholic beverage; or

While under the influence of alcohol; or

While using any substance that affects his faculties in any way contrary to safety; or

With four one-hundredths of one percent (0.04%) or more by weight of alcohol in his blood.

Any person who operates or attempts to operate or acts or attempts to act as a crewmember of any aircraft in this Commonwealth is considered to have given his consent to one (1) or more tests of his blood, breath, and urine, or combination thereof, for the purpose of determining alcohol concentration or presence of a substance which affects his faculties in any way contrary to safety, if arrested for a violation of this section.

Testing for alcohol concentration or other substances shall be done in the manner prescribed in KRS Chapter 189A, and the defendant shall have the same rights as provided by KRS Chapter 189A with regard to refusing the test.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall be punished as provided in KRS

189A.010

. Any person who refuses a test offered pursuant to subsection (3) shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200) or be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than forty-eight (48) hours nor more than thirty (30) days, or both. Conviction for a violation of subsection (2) shall not bar a conviction for refusal to take tests for alcohol or other substances. Conviction for refusal to take tests for violation of alcohol or other substances shall not bar a conviction for a violation of subsection (2).

The filing of charges, results of chemical testing, and results of the trial or other subsequent proceedings shall be reported to the division, branch, or office of the Federal Aviation Administration having jurisdiction for regulation and certification by the law enforcement agency making the arrest within thirty (30) days of the date of arrest. Law enforcement agencies possessing evidence of a violation of this section shall present the evidence for use by the Federal Aviation Administration as well as for prosecution by the state under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 327, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Lotz, A Survey of Criminal Law Statutes Enacted in 1992, 20 N. Ky. L. Rev. 745 (1993).

183.070.
State licensing and registration requirement. [Repealed]

History.

165-51: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 153, § 7; 1960, ch. 179, § 10; repealed by 2022 ch. 218, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

183.075.
Human trafficking hotline telephone number to be prominently displayed in each airport’s publicly accessible restrooms.

As used in this section, “airport” has the same meaning as in KRS

183.011

.

An airport shall post in all of its publicly accessible restrooms a printed sign in English and Spanish at least eleven (11) inches by fourteen (14) inches in size, with letters at least one (1) inch high, displaying the current telephone hotline number of the National Human Trafficking Resource Center or any federally funded successor entity. The sign shall be:

Created using gender-neutral language supplied by the Office of the Attorney General; and

Posted in a prominent place easily seen by patrons.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 75, § 3, effective July 15, 2020.

183.080.
Air traffic rules.

The cabinet may promulgate air traffic rules applicable to the operation of aircraft within the state, but the rules shall be in conformity with the air traffic rules adopted by the Federal Aviation Administration as nearly as possible. The cabinet may also promulgate such other rules, not in conflict with the Federal Aviation Administration regulations necessary for safe, adequate, and convenient operation of airports, air navigation, air transportation, and all matters relating to said functions.

History.

165-52: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 153, § 8; 1960, ch. 179, § 11; 1976, ch. 308, § 4.

183.085.
Unmanned aircraft facility map for commercial airport.

A commercial airport may prepare an unmanned aircraft facility map. In preparing the map, a commercial airport shall consult with the Federal Aviation Administration air traffic control tower at the airport,

Any unmanned aircraft facility map developed by a commercial airport shall be filed with the secretary of the airport board and shall be prominently displayed on the airport’s Web site.

An unmanned aircraft facility map shall not extend beyond the approach surface areas specifically described in 14 C.F.R. sec. 77.19(d), and as published in the official airport master plan record.

If the Federal Aviation Administration creates and makes available a map for the commercial airport that restricts the areas where it is unsafe to operate an unmanned aircraft in the areas described in 14 C.F.R. sec. 77.19(d), that map shall be the unmanned aircraft facility map of the commercial airport.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 153, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

183.086.
Restrictions on operation of unmanned aircraft — Exemption.

An operator of an unmanned aircraft or a direct supervisor of an operator of an unmanned aircraft, if that direct supervisor holds a remote pilot certificate under 14 C.F.R. Part 107, shall not operate or allow an unmanned aircraft to operate:

In a manner that allows an incursion of an unmanned aircraft into areas prohibited for the operation, taking off, and landing of an unmanned aircraft as designated by a commercial airport’s unmanned aircraft facility map, except with the approval of the commercial airport operator; or

In a reckless manner so as to create a risk of serious physical injury to another or a risk of damage to property.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to an operator of an unmanned aircraft for a commercial purpose in compliance with Federal Aviation Administration regulations, authorizations, or exemptions.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 153, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

183.090.
Inspection of general aviation airport facilities — Certificate of approval — Revocation.

The cabinet shall cause all general aviation airport facilities in the state to be inspected to determine the safety and adequacy of such facilities. No person shall operate any aircraft from a general aviation airport declared unfit by the cabinet.

In determining whether it shall issue a certificate of approval for the use or operation of a general aviation airport, the cabinet shall take into consideration its location, size, layout, safety of operations, the relationship of the airport to a comprehensive plan for statewide and nationwide development, whether the adjoining area is free from obstructions based on a proper glide ratio, the nature of the terrain, the nature of the uses to which the airport will be put, and the possibilities for future development.

The cabinet is empowered to temporarily or permanently revoke any certificate of approval issued by it when it shall determine that a general aviation airport is not being maintained or used in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with it.

History.

165-54: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 48, § 6; 1958, ch. 153, § 9; 1960, ch. 179, § 12; 2019 ch. 121, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

183.100.
Compliance with air traffic rules.

No person shall operate any aircraft within the state in any form of navigation whatsoever in violation of the air traffic rules promulgated by the cabinet or the Federal Aviation Administration. For enforcement purposes, cabinet personnel shall have access at all reasonable times to appropriate books, records, and logs of any person operating aircraft in the state.

History.

165-53: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 153, § 10; 1960, ch. 179, § 13; 1976, ch. 308, § 5.

183.110.
Police powers of secretary, officers and employees.

The secretary and officers and employees of the cabinet designated by order of the secretary shall be peace officers and may arrest any person found violating any provision of this chapter or any civil air regulation promulgated by the Federal Aviation Administration.

The secretary, in his discretion, may commission any official or employee of an airport board or governmental unit not authorized by KRS

183.880

to establish a safety and security department as peace officers and such persons so commissioned shall have all of the powers of peace officers in respect to the enforcement of this chapter or any civil air regulation promulgated by the Federal Aviation Administration and rules and regulations promulgated by airport boards or governmental units.

History.

165-55: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 153, § 11; 1960, ch. 179, § 14; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(6); 1976, ch. 300, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Kentucky law enforcement council is not required to train airport security guards at its expense, however it may do so pursuant to the authority of KRS 15.340(2), at the employer’s expense.

OAG 73-573

; 73-728.

A special policeman appointed under KRS

95.160

, as a state officer, would have a great deal more authority in the enforcement of statutes than an officer appointed under subsection (2) of this section who is neither a peace officer nor a state officer but is an officer, in the technical sense, of some sovereignty and, since a state officer cannot be a municipal officer, the two positions would be incompatible.

OAG 74-13

.

Airport security police have neither authority to arrest for disorderly conduct under KRS

437.016

(repealed) nor the power of arrest pursuant to a city ordinance.

OAG 74-13

.

183.120.
Acquisition of facilities by cabinet — Aid to other agencies.

The cabinet may acquire or dispose by contract, purchase, lease, donation, condemnation or otherwise, airports, buildings, runways, grounds and other facilities suitable for airport purposes and the proper safeguards to flying where such acquisition or disposal shall be in the public interest.

The cabinet may make additions and improvements to such airports, or facilities and either alone or with the cooperation of others provide personnel, heat, light, water, fuel, telephone service, drainage, runways, fueling facilities, radio and navigation facilities, and other costs of operation and maintenance, including insurance, and may bear the expense of removal or change of obstructions that menace air travel.

The cabinet may enter into contracts of lease for land or facilities to which title is vested in the Commonwealth with any city, or cities, county, or counties, governmental unit, political subdivision, airboard or person for the furtherance of the purposes of this chapter. All rents or revenues derived from such contracts of lease shall become the property of the cabinet to be expended by it in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

The cabinet may give such advice and assistance, including financial aid, engineering and technical assistance within the limits of its resources as it deems advisable, to enable any governmental unit or board to acquire, construct, expand, maintain and operate airports or otherwise assist in the development of aeronautics within their limits. Such aid may include the exercise of the cabinet’s power of eminent domain, if such usage is requested by the governmental unit or board. Where such eminent domain powers are utilized, title to acquire property may vest in the governmental unit.

History.

165-57: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 153, § 12; 1960, ch. 179, § 15.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Condemnation (Eminent Domain), § 307.00.

183.121.
State airways system — State airport plan — Aeronautics controversies — Injunctive proceedings.

The cabinet may designate, design, establish, expand, or modify a state airways system which will best serve the interests of the state. It may chart such airways systems and arrange for publication and distribution of such maps, charts, notices and bulletins relating to such airways as may be required in the public interest. The system shall be supplementary to and coordinated in design and operation with the federal airways system. It may include all types of air navigation facilities, whether publicly or privately owned, provided that such facilities conform to federal safety standards.

It may participate as party plaintiff or defendant, or as intervener on behalf of the state, or on behalf of any air board or governmental unit or other person in any controversy involving any right of the state or others pertaining to aeronautics.

To enforce the provisions of this chapter the cabinet may in addition to all other remedies institute and prosecute injunctive proceedings without the execution of a bond.

The Franklin Circuit Court shall hold concurrent venue with the courts of this Commonwealth of all civil and injunctive actions instituted by the cabinet for the enforcement of this chapter and the orders, rules and regulations of the cabinet thereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 48, § 4; 1958, ch. 153, § 13; 1960, ch. 179, § 16.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Airport operations or flight of aircraft as nuisance. 79 A.L.R.3d 253.

183.122.
Condemnation — Effect on zoning of adjacent property.

Where necessary, in order to provide unobstructed air space for the landing and taking off of aircraft utilizing airports acquired or operated under the provisions of this chapter, the cabinet is hereby granted authority to condemn and acquire, in the same manner as is provided for the acquisition of property for airport purposes, easements through or other interests in air space over land or water, interests in airport hazards outside the boundaries of the airports and such other airport protection privileges, together with rights of ingress and egress thereto and therefrom, as are necessary to insure safe approaches to the landing areas of said airports and the safe and efficient operation thereof. The cabinet is authorized to acquire, in the same manner, the right or easement, for a term of years or perpetually, to place or maintain suitable marks for the daytime marking and suitable lights or marks for the night marking of airport hazards, including the right of ingress and egress to and from such airport hazards for the purpose of maintaining and repairing such lights and marks.

The secretary may, by order, authorize any airport board or governmental unit to condemn and acquire, with the full power of the Commonwealth, in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, any of the interests, easements, airport protection privileges, interests in air space, rights, or hazard marking privileges described in subsection (1), or any real or personal property. Any condemnation proceeding which may be necessary for such acquisition, if filed under this subsection, shall be filed in the name of the Commonwealth on relation of the secretary of transportation, and of the airport board or governmental unit making such acquisition.

The authority granted in subsections (1) and (2) shall not be so construed as to limit the right, power, or authority of the state or any municipality or governmental unit to zone property adjacent to any airport pursuant to any law of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 48, § 7; 1958, ch. 153, § 14; 1960, ch. 179, § 17; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(6); 1976, ch. 140, § 85.

183.123.
Declaration of public purposes of governmental actions in the field of aviation.

The acquisition of any lands for the purpose of establishing airports or other air navigation facilities; the acquisition of any airport protection privileges; the acquisition, establishment, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipping, and operation of airports and other air navigation facilities, whether by the state separately or jointly with any governmental unit thereof or air board; the assistance of the state in any such acquisition, establishment, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipping and operation; and the exercise of any other powers of the cabinet as set out in this chapter, including the zoning of land in and around air facilities, are hereby declared to be public and governmental functions exercised for a public purpose, and matters of public necessity, and such lands and other property and privileges acquired, zoned and used in the manner and for the purposes enumerated in this chapter shall and are hereby declared to be acquired, zoned and used for public and governmental purposes and as a matter of public necessity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 48, § 12; 1958, ch. 153, § 15; 1960, ch. 179, § 18.

183.125.
Purchase of liability insurance.

The cabinet may purchase necessary insurance to provide adequate protection for the public; its authorized pilots and employees; pilots employed by other departments of state government; aircraft owned, leased or operated by the cabinet; aircraft owned, leased or operated by other departments of state government; the health and lives of persons being transported in aircraft owned, leased or operated by authorized pilots employed by the state.

The commissioner of insurance, upon recommendation of the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, shall initiate and be responsible for the purchase of such insurance. If other departments of state government desire that their pilots, employees, aircraft and passengers shall be insured under such policy, then the commissioner of insurance shall prorate the cost of the insurance among the departments participating.

Each policy shall contain a provision reciting that the defense of immunity of the state against such liability shall be waived, but only to the extent of the limits of the policy. Judgment against the state in any case shall not exceed the limits of the policy. The venue of action shall be as provided by the civil rules. The limits of liability of the policy shall be determined by the commissioner of insurance, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet and the commissioners of any other participating departments.

Any policy purchased under this section, shall be purchased only from insurers authorized to do business in this state and shall be countersigned by a licensed resident agent.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 179, § 80, effective March 25, 1960; 2010, ch. 24, § 232, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A person injured by the negligence of a state employee has an option whether to proceed through the board of claims or against the individual employee, but the remedy, once elected, is exclusive.

OAG 61-994

.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Airport operations liability insurance. 92 A.L.R.3d 1267.

183.130.
Federal aid.

The cabinet is the proper agency of the state to accept and receive financial or other aid from the United States government for the acquisition, construction, maintenance and operation of airports, air markings and other air navigational aids or otherwise in carrying out the promotion of aviation, whether the work is to be done by the state or at the expense of cities or governmental units aided by grants or aids from the United States.

When acquisition or construction of airports or other facilities is made at the joint expense of the cabinet, board or governmental units and the United States government, the cabinet shall, on behalf of such board or governmental unit, accept and receipt for any money paid over by the United States government and forthwith pay such money over to the board or governmental unit under the terms and conditions imposed by the United States government in making the grants.

History.

165-58: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 153, § 16; 1960, ch. 179, § 19.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Disposition of private funds and contributions available to state departments and agencies, KRS

41.290

.